Maine, session 132, LD2214.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Boundary line. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
boundary line between the Town of Kittery and the Town of York is as described:
Beginning at the base of a 5-foot tall 3-inch by 9-inch granite monument found at the
northwesterly corner of the Town of Kittery and the southwesterly line of the Town of
York, located N 35°48'52" E, a distance of 48.45 feet from a 2-foot tall 6-inch by 6-inch
granite monument found with disc stamped "1995 YORK ELIOT STA 202-49.63 CIVIL
CONSULTANTS PLS 1302" at the northeasterly corner of the Town of Eliot and common
line of the Towns of York and Kittery;
1. Thence S 74°55'57" E, a distance of 151.79 feet to the centerline of a discontinued
road known as Gee Road or Old Cutts Road;
2. Thence S 58°04'52" E, a distance of 1,591.44 feet;
Page 1 - 132LR3004(03)

3. Thence S 53°25'18" E, a distance of 2,048.07 feet to a 5/8-inch iron rebar with
identifying cap marked "U.S. DEPT. OF INTERIOR – FISH AND WILDLIFE SERVICE
– TR 22 COR 241 – PLS 2384 – 2023";
4. Thence S 53°22'19" E, a distance of 468.58 feet to a 3/4-inch iron pipe;
5. Thence S 53°21'17" E, a distance of 399.80 feet to a 3/4-inch iron pipe;
6. Thence S 56°49'54" E, a distance of 150.33 feet to a point near the westerly sideline
of Betty Welch Road;
7. Thence S 43°27'47" E, a distance of 50.31 feet to a point near the easterly sideline
of said Betty Welch Road;
8. Thence S 55°12'35" E partially along remains of a stone wall, a distance of 92.38
feet;
9. Thence S 57°55'09" E along said stone wall remains, a distance of 41.51 feet to the
end of said stone wall remains;
10. Thence S 52°42'17" E, a distance of 106.31 feet to the beginning of stone wall
remains;
11. Thence S 53°18'12" E, a distance of 38.26 feet to a point to the end of said stone
wall remains and a barbed wire fence;
12. Thence S 53°15'32" E, a distance of 307.11 feet to a tree embedded with barbed
wire fence;
13. Thence S 48°52'46" E along a barbed wire fence, a distance of 60.39 feet;
14. Thence S 53°41'38" E, a distance of 320.72 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
15. Thence S 52°33'59" E along said stone wall, a distance of 55.50 feet;
16. Thence S 55°26'51" E along said stone wall, a distance of 145.46 feet;
17. Thence S 53°49'54" E along said stone wall, a distance of 28.65 feet;
18. Thence S 42°54'12" E along said stone wall, a distance of 17.66 feet;
19. Thence S 58°22'49" E along said stone wall, a distance of 42.47 feet;
20. Thence S 54°56'50" E along said stone wall, a distance of 30.63 feet to a stone
wall end;
21. Thence S 55°26'19" E, a distance of 922.07 feet to a 6-inch by 6-inch concrete
highway monument;
22. Thence S 56°02'51" E, a distance of 335.90 feet to a 6-inch by 6-inch concrete
highway monument with a drill hole on the northwesterly sideline of Interstate 95;
23. Thence S 56°34'41" E, a distance of 635.55 feet to the intersection of a stone wall
and the southeasterly sideline of Interstate 95;
24. Thence S 63°01'42" E partially along said stone wall, a distance of 167.51 feet to
the beginning of a stone wall;
25. Thence S 60°20'38" E along said stone wall, a distance of 242.94 feet to stone wall
intersection;
Page 2 - 132LR3004(03)

26. Thence S 31°49'29" W along said stone wall, a distance of 78.87 feet to a drill hole
in said stone wall on the northeasterly sideline of Parsons Lane;
27. Thence S 52°04'31" E along said Parsons Lane, a distance of 224.58 feet to the
beginning of stone wall remains;
28. Thence S 50°06'32" E along said Parsons Lane and partially along said stone wall
remains, a distance of 289.81 feet to a 1 1/2-inch iron pipe in said stone wall remains;
29. Thence S 50°53'17" E along said Parsons Lane, a distance of 284.70 feet to a 2-
inch iron pipe;
30. Thence S 55°33'32" E along said Parsons Lane, a distance of 173.02 feet;
31. Thence S 54°30'52" E along said Parsons Lane, a distance of 174.14 feet to a 2-
inch iron pipe;
32. Thence S 57°29'03" E along said Parsons Lane, a distance of 316.82 feet to a point
near the westerly sideline of U.S. Route 1;
33. Thence S 35°12'57" E, a distance of 72.80 feet to a 2-inch iron pipe near the
easterly sideline of U.S. Route 1;
34. Thence S 48°59'32" E, a distance of 282.64 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
35. Thence S 49°50'11" E along said stone wall, a distance of 90.31 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
36. Thence S 47°40'32" E, a distance of 52.39 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
37. Thence S 49°29'55" E along said stone wall, a distance of 116.45 feet;
38. Thence S 46°13'38" E along said stone wall, a distance of 29.30 feet;
39. Thence S 51°58'56" E along said stone wall, a distance of 59.64 feet;
40. Thence S 47°59'13" E along said stone wall, a distance of 11.38 feet to a stone
wall corner;
41. Thence S 48°09'08" E, a distance of 283.55 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
42. Thence S 54°57'32" E along said stone wall, a distance of 38.47 feet;
43. Thence S 53°57'44" E along said stone wall, a distance of 77.39 feet;
44. Thence S 35°50'06" E along said stone wall, a distance of 31.78 feet;
45. Thence S 55°04'41" E along said stone wall, a distance of 24.83 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
46. Thence S 51°16'02" E, a distance of 104.86 feet to a stone wall corner with a 1
1/2-inch iron pipe;
47. Thence S 51°23'43" E along said stone wall, a distance of 59.27 feet to stone wall
intersection;
48. Thence S 52°08'10" E along said stone wall, a distance of 58.42 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
49. Thence S 62°19'16" E, a distance of 7.44 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
50. Thence S 56°16'09" E along said stone wall, a distance of 13.62 feet;
Page 3 - 132LR3004(03)

51. Thence S 49°22'29" E along said stone wall, a distance of 25.03 feet;
52. Thence S 60°31'13" E along said stone wall, a distance of 20.02 feet;
53. Thence S 51°26'03" E along said stone wall, a distance of 18.51 feet;
54. Thence S 42°28'29" E along said stone wall, a distance of 34.80 feet;
55. Thence S 47°57'25" E along said stone wall, a distance of 46.77 feet to a drill hole
in said stone wall;
56. Thence S 53°33'49" E along said stone wall, a distance of 53.92 feet;
57. Thence S 51°39'23" E along said stone wall, a distance of 77.61 feet;
58. Thence S 53°00'16" E along said stone wall, a distance of 36.97 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
59. Thence S 50°54'28" E, a distance of 17.95 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
60. Thence S 52°51'53" E along said stone wall, a distance of 107.92 feet to a drill
hole in said stone wall;
61. Thence S 55°07'03" E along said stone wall, a distance of 93.79 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
62. Thence S 62°10'24" E, a distance of 4.67 feet to beginning of a stone wall;
63. Thence S 52°57'00" E along said stone wall, a distance of 31.10 feet to a drill hole
in said stone wall;
64. Thence S 44°23'14" E along said stone wall, a distance of 17.36 feet;
65. Thence S 53°03'40" E along said stone wall, a distance of 201.36 feet to the end
of said stone wall;
66. Thence S 46°24'03" E, a distance of 383.66 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
67. Thence S 59°42'26" E along said stone wall, a distance of 34.92 feet;
68. Thence S 55°17'23" E along said stone wall, a distance of 38.52 feet;
69. Thence S 58°49'09" E along said stone wall, a distance of 32.53 feet;
70. Thence S 51°10'52" E along said stone wall, a distance of 44.35 feet;
71. Thence S 56°58'29" E along said stone wall, a distance of 22.71 feet to a drill hole
in said stone wall;
72. Thence S 48°11'47" E along said stone wall, a distance of 71.53 feet;
73. Thence S 46°23'19" E along said stone wall, a distance of 75.87 feet;
74. Thence S 49°24'03" E along said stone wall, a distance of 23.98 feet;
75. Thence S 53°50'45" E along said stone wall, a distance of 27.87 feet;
76. Thence S 49°28'27" E along said stone wall, a distance of 51.42 feet to a stone
wall intersection;
77. Thence S 50°23'37" E along said stone wall, a distance of 69.64 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
78. Thence S 52°52'48" E, a distance of 230.58 feet to a stone wall corner;
Page 4 - 132LR3004(03)

79. Thence S 51°57'36" E along said stone wall, a distance of 24.42 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
80. Thence S 48°41'37" E, a distance of 10.16 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
81. Thence S 52°17'45" E along said stone wall, a distance of 67.30 feet;
82. Thence S 53°22'24" E along said stone wall, a distance of 93.19 feet;
83. Thence S 59°26'50" E along said stone wall, a distance of 11.59 feet;
84. Thence S 54°15'23" E along said stone wall, a distance of 20.78 feet;
85. Thence S 49°00'07" E along said stone wall, a distance of 50.55 feet;
86. Thence S 53°28'14" E partially along said stone wall, a distance of 60.56 feet to a
point in said stone wall;
87. Thence S 62°44'57" E along said stone wall, a distance of 14.94 feet;
88. Thence S 52°36'12" E partially along said stone wall and stone wall remains, a
distance of 213.30 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
89. Thence S 54°31'23" E along said stone wall, a distance of 21.82 feet to the end of
said stone wall;
90. Thence S 52°12'05" E, a distance of 156.31 feet to a drill hole at the beginning of
a stone wall;
91. Thence S 54°37'29" E along said stone wall, a distance of 94.71 feet;
92. Thence S 43°10'27" E along said stone wall, a distance of 27.88 feet;
93. Thence S 54°25'01" E along said stone wall, a distance of 75.21 feet;
94. Thence S 50°10'16" E along said stone wall, a distance of 80.90 feet to a 4-inch by
4-inch granite monument;
95. Thence S 50°56'45" E, a distance of 538.97 feet to a 4-inch by 4-inch granite
monument in said stone wall at a stone wall corner;
96. Thence S 36°36'40" E along said stone wall, a distance of 17.74 feet;
97. Thence S 49°30'54" E along said stone wall, a distance of 58.27 feet;
98. Thence S 45°56'27" E along said stone wall, a distance of 69.35 feet;
99. Thence S 55°47'19" E along said stone wall, a distance of 25.30 feet;
100. Thence S 50°16'36" E along said stone wall, a distance of 138.81 feet;
101. Thence S 36°53'27" E along said stone wall, a distance of 40.90 feet;
102. Thence S 30°20'31" E along said stone wall, a distance of 19.30 feet;
103. Thence S 24°11'48" E along said stone wall, a distance of 20.28 feet to the end
of said stone wall and the beginning of stone wall remains;
104. Thence S 50°49'13" E along said stone wall remains, a distance of 69.17 feet;
105. Thence S 46°51'39" E partially along said stone wall remains, a distance of 188.73
feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
106. Thence S 54°28'54" E along said stone wall, a distance of 69.21 feet;
Page 5 - 132LR3004(03)

107. Thence S 49°39'58" E along said stone wall, a distance of 44.41 feet;
108. Thence S 52°48'42" E along said stone wall, a distance of 19.44 feet to a 5/8-inch
rebar with identification cap marked "ALE 1197" in a stone wall intersection;
109. Thence S 55°23'17" E along said stone wall, a distance of 23.11 feet to the end
of stone wall and the beginning of stone wall remains;
110. Thence S 55°57'22" E along said stone wall remains, a distance of 85.01 feet;
111. Thence S 53°46'21" E along said stone wall remains, a distance of 114.72 feet to
the beginning of a stone wall;
112. Thence S 43°53'01" E along said stone wall, a distance of 40.69 feet;
113. Thence S 59°23'28" E along said stone wall, a distance of 37.68 feet;
114. Thence S 54°54'07" E along said stone wall, a distance of 108.40 feet;
115. Thence S 41°53'54" E along said stone wall, a distance of 8.75 feet;
116. Thence S 56°24'51" E along said stone wall, a distance of 46.45 feet to a drill
hole at a stone wall intersection;
117. Thence S 53°03'59" E along said stone wall, a distance of 167.12 feet;
118. Thence S 51°58'31" E along said stone wall, a distance of 74.89 feet;
119. Thence S 57°05'59" E along said stone wall, a distance of 72.39 feet to the end
of said stone wall;
120. Thence S 59°03'10" E partially along a stone wall, a distance of 121.65 feet to a
5/8-inch iron rod in a stone wall intersection;
121. Thence S 58°04'15" E along said stone wall, a distance of 19.19 feet;
122. Thence S 49°16'43" E along said stone wall, a distance of 12.34 feet;
123. Thence S 68°16'30" E along said stone wall, a distance of 49.03 feet;
124. Thence S 50°58'24" E along said stone wall, a distance of 97.81 feet to a 5/8-inch
rebar in a stone wall intersection;
125. Thence S 53°33'10" E along said stone wall, a distance of 134.46 feet;
126. Thence S 50°39'27" E along said stone wall, a distance of 202.96 feet to stone
wall corner;
127. Thence S 54°35'10" E, a distance of 401.01 feet to the beginning of a stone wall;
128. Thence S 66°37'15" E along said stone wall, a distance of 75.15 feet to the end
of said stone wall;
129. Thence S 57°02'54" E, a distance of 322.70 feet to a point near the westerly
sideline of Bartlett Road;
130. Thence S 57°02'54" E, a distance of 51.52 feet to a point near the easterly side of
said Bartlett Road and the northerly sideline of Payne Road;
131. Thence S 46°28'40" E along said Payne Road, a distance of 180.93 feet;
132. Thence S 51°40'57" E along said Payne Road, a distance of 906.32 feet;
Page 6 - 132LR3004(03)

133. Thence S 46°33'50" E along said Payne Road, a distance of 700.39 feet;
134. Thence S 50°35'20" E along said Payne Road, a distance of 586.67 feet;
135. Thence S 46°35'43" E along said Payne Road, a distance of 258.37 feet;
136. Thence S 59°04'12" E along said Payne Road, a distance of 102.44 feet;
137. Thence S 01°56'58" W through the center of a 36-inch corrugated metal culvert
running underneath said Payne Road, a distance of 56.59 feet to the southerly sideline of
said Payne Road and center of a tidal inlet;
138. Thence S 38°27'43" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 13.65 feet;
139. Thence S 61°38'16" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 62.45 feet;
140. Thence S 46°18'38" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 42.45 feet;
141. Thence S 20°06'20" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 12.59 feet;
142. Thence S 27°04'07" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 9.01 feet;
143. Thence S 07°32'08" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 13.29 feet;
144. Thence S 30°33'38" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 11.47 feet;
145. Thence S 87°53'35" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 21.22 feet;
146. Thence S 39°00'00" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 9.53 feet;
147. Thence S 04°20'24" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 16.52 feet;
148. Thence S 21°41'44" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 25.71 feet;
149. Thence S 23°59'49" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 4.65 feet;
150. Thence S 78°04'06" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 11.37 feet;
151. Thence N 16°25'39" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 26.71 feet;
152. Thence S 79°13'30" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 13.12 feet;
153. Thence S 48°51'18" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 11.91 feet;
154. Thence S 07°26'20" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 30.69 feet;
155. Thence S 17°05'22" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 20.89 feet;
156. Thence S 20°47'00" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 32.41 feet;
157. Thence S 83°47'54" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 8.37 feet;
158. Thence N 67°16'02" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 22.69 feet;
159. Thence S 66°29'26" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 9.63 feet;
160. Thence S 10°13'34" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 12.93 feet;
161. Thence S 35°17'25" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 10.30 feet;
162. Thence S 12°35'25" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 22.74 feet;
163. Thence S 50°11'56" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 8.28 feet;
164. Thence N 47°05'34" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 29.71 feet;
165. Thence S 62°15'55" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 16.56 feet;
Page 7 - 132LR3004(03)

166. Thence S 18°03'35" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 10.66 feet;
167. Thence S 23°51'17" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 33.48 feet;
168. Thence S 21°03'30" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 40.00 feet;
169. Thence S 03°29'41" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 13.06 feet;
170. Thence S 25°46'25" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 6.07 feet;
171. Thence S 09°27'11" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 21.55 feet;
172. Thence S 04°47'45" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 34.92 feet;
173. Thence S 44°50'14" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 20.46 feet;
174. Thence N 87°05'59" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 10.87 feet;
175. Thence S 21°25'22" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 13.08 feet;
176. Thence S 46°09'23" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 45.87 feet;
177. Thence S 16°29'21" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 18.14 feet;
178. Thence S 26°23'11" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 12.93 feet;
179. Thence S 04°51'15" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 54.45 feet;
180. Thence S 59°12'02" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 18.37 feet;
181. Thence S 32°39'08" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 20.22 feet;
182. Thence S 25°19'54" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 11.23 feet;
183. Thence S 58°58'47" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 28.54 feet;
184. Thence S 20°27'35" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 39.05 feet;
185. Thence S 08°52'27" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 44.95 feet;
186. Thence S 32°11'08" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 15.00 feet;
187. Thence S 67°39'20" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 32.80 feet;
188. Thence S 48°23'42" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 17.39 feet;
189. Thence S 09°21'43" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 24.62 feet;
190. Thence S 15°39'27" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 22.16 feet;
191. Thence S 27°20'38" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 12.19 feet;
192. Thence S 53°51'03" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 24.13 feet;
193. Thence S 05°01'23" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 20.53 feet;
194. Thence S 21°40'02" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 36.37 feet;
195. Thence S 10°35'30" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 16.14 feet;
196. Thence S 27°36'22" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 40.96 feet;
197. Thence S 26°25'32" W along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 63.00 feet;
198. Thence S 46°58'05" E along the thread of the inlet, a distance of 26.00 feet to a
point near the westerly sideline of State Route 103;
Page 8 - 132LR3004(03)

199. Thence S 51°32'12" E along the thread of the inlet being through and along the
center of the box culvert for the bridge crossing, a distance of 49.50 feet to the easterly
sideline of State Route 103;
200. Thence S 53°01'20" E, a distance of 103.88 feet;
201. Thence S 15°07'16" E, a distance of 155.96 feet;
202. Thence S 04°05'23" W, a distance of 155.57 feet;
203. Thence S 47°19'48" W, a distance of 89.31 feet;
204. Thence S 33°20'00" E, a distance of 210.38 feet;
205. Thence S 14°14'24" E, a distance of 135.32 feet;
206. Thence S 73°56'47" E, a distance of 231.60 feet;
207. Thence S 32°07'57" E, a distance of 192.66 feet;
208. Thence S 02°34'01" E, a distance of 188.47 feet;
209. Thence S 56°43'17" E, a distance of 291.98 feet;
210. Thence S 27°20'08" E, a distance of 412.60 feet;
211. Thence S 62°09'02" E, a distance of 583.68 feet;
212. Thence S 13°48'35" E, a distance of 560.00 feet;
213. Thence S 65°22'42" E, a distance of 675.96 feet;
214. Thence S 19°27'31" E, a distance of 174.71 feet;
215. Thence S 25°52'02" W, a distance of 733.83 feet;
216. Thence S 14°56'46" E, a distance of 263.27 feet;
217. Thence S 61°39'04" E, a distance of 1,574.30 feet;
218. Thence N 83°43'26" E, a distance of 1,145.45 feet;
219. Thence S 63°56'51" E to the Atlantic Ocean.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 9 - 132LR3004(03)